Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-403
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 82-401 to 82-408, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Art shall mean the conscious use of skill, taste, and creative imagination in the production of aesthetic objects and may include sculpture, painting, photography, prints, tapestries, weavings, film, videotape, folk arts and crafts, graphic design, pottery, architectural sketches, and other items considered to be art; and

(2) Nebraska artists shall mean artists born in Nebraska, artists who have worked in or received a portion of their training in Nebraska, or artists living in Nebraska at the time of purchase of their works of art.

Laws 1979, LB 116, § 3.